Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
PART 1 General Provisions

22-3-20.
Power of persons operating or constructing electric plants to purchase, lease, or condemn rights of way and easements.

Any person operating or constructing or preparing to construct a plant for generating electricity shall have the right to purchase, lease, or condemn rights of way or other easements over the lands of others in order to run power lines, maintain dams, flow backwater, or carry on other activities necessary for constructing and operating such a plant, provided that the person first pays just compensation to the owner of the land to be affected.

History.

Ga. L. 1897, p. 68, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 5240; Code 1933, § 36-801.

Cross references.

Granting of easements and rights of way to electric utilities for purposes of producing hydroelectric power from dam sites on property owned by governing authority of recreation system, §

36-64-3.1

.

Law reviews.

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007).

22-3-21.
Payment of compensation or damages.

In fixing the compensation or damage for both actual and consequential damages, either or both shall be paid by the persons seeking to condemn property as provided in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 272, § 1; Code 1933, § 36-802.

22-3-22.
Condemnation of mills, factories, and dams.

Any person seeking to exercise the power of eminent domain under Code Section 22-3-20 shall have the right and authority to acquire by condemnation any mill, factory, dam, or other property or interest connected with same, except cotton mills or factories or any plant engaged in furnishing electric power to the public.

History.

Civil Code 1910, § 5242; Ga. L. 1925, p. 272, § 3; Code 1933, § 36-812.